Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-232.06
School lands; irrigable; lease; cost of tolls and assessments; collection.

When any irrigable school lands located within the boundaries of an irrigation district are leased, the Board of Educational Lands and Funds shall collect with the regular rental an amount sufficient to pay the cost of current tolls and assessments of the irrigation district on such land, and shall pay such tolls and assessments to the district each year. The amount so collected and paid by the board shall be a part of the cost of administering the school lands and shall be included in the costs certified to the State Treasurer pursuant to section 72-232.02.

Laws 1971, LB 581, § 4.